Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.080.
License required; restrictions and conditions.

A person may not pilot a vessel subject to this chapter unless the person is licensed under this chapter and is a member of a pilot organization recognized by the board.

A pilot may not be licensed in more than one pilotage region at one time unless the commissioner determines that an actual or imminent shortage of licensed pilots exists in a pilotage region. If the commissioner makes the determination described in this subsection, the board may, after consultation with the recognized pilot organizations and registered agents in the affected pilotage region, issue temporary licenses for the affected pilotage region to pilots who already hold a license for another pilotage region. The board shall ensure that sufficient pilots are available to provide pilotage services in the affected pilotage region to all vessels required to employ a pilot under this chapter. A temporary license issued under this subsection is valid for a period of not more than one year.

A license issued under this chapter must identify the specific waterways and ports in each pilotage region in which a licensee is authorized by the board to pilot vessels. The board shall authorize a licensee to pilot vessels in a specific waterway or port in a pilotage region upon the licensee satisfying the training and other qualifying requirements required by the board to pilot vessels in that waterway or port.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am §§ 8, 9 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 8 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.090.
Application.

A person who desires to be licensed under this chapter shall apply in writing to the department.

The application shall provide the information and be made on a form prescribed by the department.

In order to be eligible to take the next scheduled examination, a person shall file the application with the board at least 60 days before the date of the examination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 10 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 9 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Sec. 08.62.093.
Qualifications for deputy marine pilot license.

The board shall issue a deputy marine pilot license for a marine pilotage region to a person who

is a citizen of the United States;

passes the written and oral examinations that may be required by the board;

has completed training requirements established by the board; and

satisfies (b) and (c) of this section.

A person who applies for a deputy marine pilot license under this chapter shall provide proof satisfactory to the board of the following experience:

one year of service as a master on ocean or coastwise vessels while holding a United States Coast Guard license as master of ocean steam or motor vessels of any gross tons;

two years of service as a master on United States Coast Guard inspected vessels of not less than 1,000 gross tons or tug and tow of not less than 1,600 combined gross tons while holding at least a United States Coast Guard license as master of steam or motor vessels of not more than 1,600 gross tons;

two years of service as a chief officer on ocean or coastwise vessels of not less than 1,600 gross tons while holding a United States Coast Guard license as master of ocean steam or motor vessels of any gross tons;

two years of service as commanding officer of United States commissioned vessels of not less than 1,600 gross tons and hold a United States Coast Guard license as master of ocean steam or motor vessels of any gross tons;

three years of experience as a member of a professional pilot’s organization, during which the person actively engaged in piloting while holding at least a United States Coast Guard license as a master of steam or motor vessels of not more than 1,600 gross tons; or

four years of experience gained in a board approved deputy marine pilot apprenticeship program in the pilotage region for which the deputy marine pilot license is sought and hold at least a United States Coast Guard license as master of steam or motor vessels of not more than 1,600 gross tons.

A person who applies for a deputy marine pilot license under this section shall possess an endorsement of first class pilotage on the person’s United States Coast Guard license without tonnage restrictions for the pilotage region for which the person seeks the deputy marine pilot license.

A person licensed as a deputy marine pilot under this section may, except as otherwise provided by the board, pilot vessels of 25,000 gross tons or less in a marine pilotage region for which the license is issued.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 74 SLA 1995.]

History.

(§ 11 ch 89 SLA 1991; am §§ 10, 11, 22 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.097.
Training programs for deputy marine pilot license.

The board shall establish standards for training programs for a deputy marine pilot license. The standards may include requirements for

supervised familiarization and training trips on vessels subject to this chapter;

supervised dockings, undockings, and tug assisted maneuvers;

special training or experience necessary to qualify for a deputy marine pilot license for a particular marine pilotage region;

completion of the training program within a specified period;

other training or experience that the board considers appropriate.

A person who supervises the training of persons who are seeking a deputy marine pilot license under this chapter shall

hold a marine pilot license issued under AS

08.62.100

; however, if the board finds that there are no marine pilots licensed in a pilotage region who are available to supervise training under this section, the board may authorize a person who is licensed in that pilotage region as a deputy marine pilot to supervise the training of persons who are seeking a deputy marine pilot license in that pilotage region;

receive prior authorization from the board to supervise the training of those persons;

maintain a written log and evaluation on a form provided by the board of the training and progress of the person being supervised.

History.

(§ 11 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 12 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.100.
Qualifications for a marine pilot license.

The board shall issue a marine pilot license for a marine pilotage region to a person who

is a citizen of the United States;

passes examinations that may be required by the board;

has three years experience as a deputy marine pilot licensed under this chapter; and

satisfies additional requirements as may be required by the board by regulation.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person who holds a marine pilot license of any type on the day before July 2, 1991 shall, subject to continued eligibility for the license under this chapter and regulations adopted under this chapter, receive a renewable marine pilot license of the same type and subject to the same qualifications and endorsements as that which the person held on July 1, 1991. A person who receives a license under this subsection may change the type of marine pilot license and the qualifications and endorsements attached to the license in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

For very large crude carriers (VLCC), see 12 AAC 56, art. 6.

Sec. 08.62.110.
Previous licensure. [Repealed, § 27 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 08.62.120.
Renewal of licenses.

In order to renew a marine pilot license, a person who is licensed under AS

08.62.100

shall

submit an application for renewal of the license on a form provided by the department;

submit proof of continued qualification under AS

08.62.100

to receive a marine pilot license;

provide evidence of satisfactory completion of a physical examination by a licensed physician within 60 days before the date of renewal of the license;

submit proof satisfactory to the board that the person has

engaged in piloting vessels subject to this chapter in the marine pilotage region for which the license is to be renewed during at least 120 days in the licensing period immediately preceding the licensing period for which renewal is sought; or

completed the minimum number of familiarization trips required by the board for renewal of a marine pilot license for a marine pilotage region for which the license is to be renewed.

The board shall establish criteria for the renewal of a deputy marine pilot license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 28 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 13 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 13 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For license duration and further provisions relating to renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.130.
Lapsed license.

The board shall reinstate a lapsed marine pilot license if, in addition to complying with the requirements of AS

08.01.100(a)

— (c) and AS

08.62.120

, the pilot takes and passes a written and oral examination if the license has been lapsed one year or more.

The board shall establish criteria for reinstatement of a lapsed deputy marine pilot license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1973; am § 14 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.140.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for applications, licenses, agent registrations, investigations, audits, and training.

The fee for an application for an exemption under AS

08.62.180(b)

from the mandatory pilotage requirement of this chapter is $250 plus $50 for each whole foot in overall length of the vessel that exceeds 65 feet.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 143 SLA 1980; am § 35 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 39 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.62.150.
Denial, revocation, or suspension.

The board shall impose a disciplinary sanction on a person licensed under this chapter when the board finds that the person

is incompetent in the performance of pilotage duties;

is chemically impaired;

illegally possesses, uses, or sells narcotic or hallucinogenic drugs;

makes a false statement to obtain a license;

violates a provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter;

is guilty of misconduct during the course of employment;

has had the person’s United States Coast Guard pilot license conditioned, suspended, or revoked; or

charges, collects, or receives an amount for pilotage services that is different from the rate adopted under AS

08.62.046

or the rate agreed to under AS

08.62.175(e)

by the pilot organization of which the person is a member.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 60 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 143 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 4 ch 60 SLA 1987; am § 16 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 14 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Sec. 08.62.155.
Disciplinary sanctions.

The board may take disciplinary action against a person licensed under this chapter under AS

08.01.075

.

The board may impose a civil fine not to exceed $5,000 on a marine pilot organization recognized by the board if the organization violates this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter. The board may also suspend or revoke the recognition of a pilot organization that fails to comply with its articles, bylaws, and rules, so as to no longer satisfy the minimum standards for recognition by the board.

History.

(§ 3 ch 60 SLA 1987; am § 17 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 15 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of boards generally, see AS

08.01.075

.